District of Columbia statutes.
16-4207

Confidentiality.

Unless subject to § 1-207.42, mediation communications are confidential to the extent agreed by the parties or provided by other law or rule of the District of Columbia.

Apr. 4, 2006, D.C. Law 16-87, § 2(b), 53 DCR 1075
Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 8 of the Uniform Mediation Act.